Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.76.090

Rendering criminal assistance in the third degree.

(1) A person is guilty of rendering criminal assistance in the third degree if he or she renders criminal assistance to a person who has committed a gross misdemeanor or misdemeanor.

(2) Rendering criminal assistance in the third degree is a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 401; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.76.090.]